Massachusetts, session 194th, H2226.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall
be a commission established pursuant to section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws to study
the availability of continuum of care services for persons with substance use disorder and the
potential creation of regional facilities for this purpose. The commission shall study and make
recommendations on: (i) the current regional availability of detoxification services, clinical
stabilization services, transitional support services, residential recovery home services and
outpatient treatment including medication assisted treatment. (ii) identify institutional barriers
that individuals face as they progress through the treatment continuum , including mental health,
physical treatment, funding, treatment costs, program space, transit options, accessibility and
housing availability that are caused by unconnected services or a lack of continuum of care
within the current recovery process. (iii) create an assessment of the need for a regional
of 3

continuum of care facilities for the treatment of substance abuse disorders and the optimal
capacity of each level of care to allow individuals to efficiently access each level of care as
clinically necessary.
(b) The commission shall consist of the House and Senate chairs of the Committee on
Mental Health, Substance Use and Recovery, who shall serve as co-chairs; a member appointed
by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; a member appointed by the Senate President;
the minority leader of the House, or a designee; the minority leader of the Senate, or a designee;
the Attorney General, or a designee; the Assistant Secretary for MassHealth; the Director of the
Massachusetts Bureau of Substance Addiction Services; the Commissioner of the Department of
Public Health, or a designee; the Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health, or a
designee; the Commissioner of the Division of Insurance, or a designee; the Boston Public
Health Commissioner, or a designee; and one from each of the following: Massachusetts
Organization for Addiction Recovery; the Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association;
Volunteers of America Massachusetts; Learn to Cope; RIZE Massachusetts; The Grayken Center
for Addiction at Boston Medical Center; the Massachusetts Association of Health Plans; and
Newmarket BID Homeless B2W Services;
(c) All appointments shall be made not later than 30 days after the effective date of this
section. The co-chairs shall convene the first meeting of the special commission within 45 days
after all appointments have been made.
(d) The commission shall submit a detailed report with its proposals and
recommendations, along with drafts of legislation necessary to carry out its recommendations, to
the clerks of the Senate and House of Representatives, the Joint Committee on Mental Health,
of 3

Substance Use and Recovery and the Governor not later than one year following the
establishment of said commission. The commission shall monitor the implementation of its
recommendations.
of 3